Maryland, session 2025, SB0528.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
11–246.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “VETERAN” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(1) HAS SERVED ON ACTIVE DUTY IN:
(I) THE UNIFORMED SERVICES OF THE UNITED STATES, AS
DEFINED IN 10 U.S.C. § 101;
(II) A RESERVE COMPONENT OF:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0528*

SENATE BILL 528
1. THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES; OR
2. THE U.S. PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICE; OR
(III) THE NATIONAL GUARD OF ANY STATE; AND
(2) WAS DISCHARGED OR RELEASED UNDER CONDITIONS OTHER
THAN DISHONORABLE.
(B) BEGINNING IN CALENDAR YEAR 2025, NOVEMBER 11 SHALL BE A
TAX–FREE DAY IN MARYLAND DURING WHICH THE SALES AND USE TAX DOES NOT
APPLY TO A SALE TO A VETERAN.
(C) TO QUALIFY FOR THE EXEMPTION UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION, AN INDIVIDUAL:
(1) SHALL PROVIDE TO THE VENDOR EVIDENCE OF ELIGIBILITY FOR
THE EXEMPTION; AND
(2) MAY ESTABLISH THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS A VETERAN BY
PRODUCING A VALID DRIVER’S LICENSE OR GOVERNMENT–ISSUED IDENTIFICATION
CARD THAT INCLUDES A NOTATION INDICATING THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS A
VETERAN.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.